Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3812
Sections; how construed.

Nothing in sections 43-3801 to 43-3811 shall be construed as a waiver of immunities to which a consulate and its consular agents are entitled under international law, the Foreign Sovereign Immunities Act of 1976, 28 U.S.C. 1602 et seq., and international treaties in force between the United States and foreign countries.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 12.